Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1228
Proceedings governed by other law.

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act does not govern an adoption proceeding or a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 3.